Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-5] Powers and duties of the director. (a) The director shall:

(1) Unless otherwise provided by law, adopt, amend,
and repeal rules pursuant to chapter 91 to carry out the purposes of this
chapter;

(2) Adopt policies and procedures as necessary,
without regard to chapter 91, for reauthorization pursuant to section 305J-10;

(3) Issue declaratory rulings or informal, nonbinding
interpretations and conduct contested case proceedings pursuant to chapter 91;

(4) Grant, deny, confirm, forfeit, renew, reinstate,
or restore authorizations, including conditional, probationary, or qualified
authorizations;

(5) Revoke, suspend, condition, or otherwise limit
the authorization of an institution for any violation of this chapter,
applicable rules, or the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended;

(6) Establish requirements for authorization in
accordance with this chapter;

(7) Investigate and conduct hearings regarding any
violation of this chapter, applicable rules, or the Higher Education Act of
1965, as amended;

(8) Create fact-finding committees, including the
appointment of one or more advisory committees, which may assist the department
and make recommendations for consideration;

(9) Contract with qualified persons, including
investigative and legal staff, who may be exempt from chapter 76, to assist the
director in exercising the director's powers and duties;

(10) Subpoena witnesses and documents, administer
oaths, and receive affidavits and oral testimony, including communications
through electronic media;

(11) Establish the types and amounts of fees that the
department may assess in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(12) Establish policies to require authorized
institutions to submit to the department, upon request, data that is directly
related to student enrollment and degree completion and, if applicable, student
financial aid and educator preparation programs, which policies shall include a
determination as to whether data received may be disclosed to the public;

(13) Establish policies and procedures for the
handling of proprietary information;

(14) Enter into any post-secondary education
authorization reciprocity agreement with other post-secondary educational
authorizers of schools whose home state is not Hawaii pursuant to section
305J-16; and

(15) Do any and all things necessary or incidental to
the exercise of the director's powers and duties.

(b) The director may cooperate with the federal government to qualify the State to
receive funds made available under the Higher Education Act of 1965, P.L.
89-329, as amended from time to time. In addition,
the department may serve as the state agency for the receipt
of federal funds when federal legislation dealing with higher education or
post-secondary education requires, as a condition of the receipt of federal
funds, the designation of a state agency that is broadly
representative of the general public and of post-secondary education in the
State and when agencies other than the department may
not qualify.

(c) No funds appropriated by
the legislature may be used to aid a person attending an institution not owned
or exclusively controlled by the State or a department of the State or to pay
for any staff work distributing federal or private funds to students attending
such schools. The maximum amount of any grant awarded under the Hawaii state
incentive grant program shall be equal to the maximum allowed by federal law.

(d) The department, when appropriate and necessary, may be assisted by other state
agencies, including but not limited to the University of Hawaii system and the
department of education.

(e) The director, acting through the
department of the attorney general, may proceed by injunction against any
violation of this chapter, but an injunction proceeding or an order issued
therein or as a result thereof shall not bar the imposition of any other
penalty for a violation of this chapter. [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next